Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5643.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 674. (1) A vehicle must not be parked, except if necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic or in compliance with the law or the directions of a police officer or traffic-control device, in any of the following places: (a) On a sidewalk. (b) In front of a public or private driveway. (c) Within an intersection. (d) Within 15 feet of a fire hydrant. (e) On a crosswalk. (f) Within 20 feet of a crosswalk, or if there is not a crosswalk, then within 15 feet of the intersection of property lines at an intersection of highways. (g) Within 30 feet of the approach to a flashing beacon, stop sign, or traffic-control signal located at the side of a highway. (h) Between a safety zone and the adjacent curb or within 30 feet of a point on the curb immediately opposite the end of a safety zone, unless a different length is indicated by an official sign or marking. (i) Within 50 feet of the nearest rail of a railroad crossing. (j) Within 20 feet of the driveway entrance to a fire station and on the side of a street opposite the entrance to a fire station within 75 feet of the entrance if properly marked by an official sign. (k) Alongside or opposite a street excavation or obstruction, if the stopping, standing, or parking would obstruct traffic. (l) On the roadway side of a vehicle stopped or parked at the edge or curb of a street. (m) Upon a bridge or other elevated highway structure or within a highway tunnel. (n) At a place where an official sign prohibits stopping or parking. (o) Within 500 feet of an accident at which a police officer is in attendance, if the scene of the accident is outside of a city or village. (p) In front of a theater. (q) In a place or in a manner that blocks immediate egress from an emergency exit conspicuously marked as an emergency exit of a building. (r) In a place or in a manner that blocks or hampers the immediate use of an immediate egress from a fire escape conspicuously marked as a fire escape providing an emergency means of egress from a building. (s) In a parking space clearly identified by an official sign as being reserved for use by disabled persons that is on public property or private property available for public use, unless the individual is a disabled person as described in section 19a or unless the individual is parking the vehicle for the benefit of a disabled person. In order for the vehicle to be parked in the parking space the vehicle must display 1 of the following: (i) A certificate of identification or windshield placard issued under section 675 to a disabled person. (ii) A special registration plate issued under section 803d to a disabled person. (iii) A similar certificate of identification or windshield placard issued by another state to a disabled person. (iv) A similar special registration plate issued by another state to a disabled person. (v) A special registration plate to which a tab for persons with disabilities is attached issued under this act. (t) In a clearly identified access aisle or access lane immediately adjacent to a space designated for parking by persons with disabilities. (u) On a street or other area open to the parking of vehicles that results in the vehicle interfering with the use of a curb-cut or ramp by persons with disabilities. (v) Within 500 feet of a fire at which fire apparatus is in attendance, if the scene of the fire is outside a city or village. However, volunteer fire fighters responding to the fire may park within 500 feet of the fire in a manner not to interfere with fire apparatus at the scene. A vehicle parked legally previous to the fire is exempt from this subdivision. (w) In violation of an official sign restricting the period of time for or manner of parking. (x) In a space controlled or regulated by a meter on a public highway or in a publicly owned parking area or structure, if the allowable time for parking indicated on the meter has expired, unless the vehicle properly displays 1 or more of the items listed in section 675(8). (y) On a street or highway in such a way as to obstruct the delivery of mail to a rural mailbox by a carrier of the United States Postal Service. (z) In a place or in a manner that blocks the use of an alley. (aa) In a place or in a manner that blocks access to a space clearly designated as a fire lane. (bb) On a streetcar track or in a manner that blocks, delays, or otherwise interferes with the movement of a streetcar on a streetcar track. (cc) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4), a center median. (2) A person shall not move a vehicle not owned by the person into a prohibited area under subsection (1) or away from a curb a distance that makes the parking unlawful. (3) A bus, for the purpose of taking on or discharging passengers, may be stopped at a place described in subsection (1)(b), (d), or (f) or on the roadway side of a vehicle illegally parked in a legally designated bus loading zone. A bus, for the purpose of taking on or discharging a passenger, may be stopped at a place described in subsection (1)(n) if the place is posted by an appropriate bus stop sign, except that a bus shall not stop at such a place if the stopping is specifically prohibited by the responsible local authority, the state transportation department, or the director of the department of state police. (4) In addition to the exceptions provided in subsection (1), a vehicle may be parked in a center median if it is temporarily necessary for a delivery driver of any kind to safely complete the pickup or delivery of goods or services and if no reasonable alternative parking location is available. For the purposes of this subsection, a center median is considered part of the roadway. (5) (4) A person who violates this section is responsible for a civil infraction.